Missouri, session 2026, SB1329.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 115.124, 115.137, 115.168, 115.225,
115.249, 115.279, 115.287, 115.327, 115.349, 115.351, 115.363,
115.395, 115.397, 115.409, and 115.429, RSMo, are repealed and
seventeen new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 115.124, 115.137, 115.168, 115.225, 115.249, 115.279,
115.287, 115.327, 115.349, 115.351, 115.363, 115.395, 115.397,
115.398, 115.409, 115.429, and 115.710, to read as follows:
115.124. 1. Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, in a nonpartisan election in any [political
subdivision or] special district [including municipal
elections in any city, town, or village] with two thousand
or fewer inhabitants that have adopted a proposal pursuant
to subsection 3 of this section [but excluding municipal
elections in any city, town, or village with more than two
thousand inhabitants,] if the notice provided for in
subsection 5 of section 115.127 has been published in at
least one newspaper of general circulation as defined in
section 493.050 in the district, and if the number of
candidates for each office in [a particular political
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1329 2
subdivision,] the special district[, or municipality] is
equal to the number of positions for each office within the
[political subdivision,] special district[, or municipality]
to be filled by the election and no ballot measure is placed
on the ballot such that a particular political subdivision
will owe no proportional elections costs if an election is
not held, no election shall be held, and the candidates
shall assume the responsibilities of their offices at the
same time and in the same manner as if they had been
elected. If no election is held for a particular [political
subdivision,] special district[, or municipality] as
provided in this section, the election authority shall
publish a notice containing the names of the candidates that
shall assume the responsibilities of office under this
section. Such notice shall be published in at least one
newspaper of general circulation as defined in section
493.050 in such [political subdivision or] district by the
first of the month in which the election would have
occurred, had it been contested. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law to the contrary, if at any election the
number of candidates filing for a particular office exceeds
the number of positions to be filled at such election, the
election authority shall hold the election as scheduled,
even if a sufficient number of candidates withdraw from such
contest for that office so that the number of candidates
remaining after the filing deadline is equal to the number
of positions to be filled.
2. The election authority or political subdivision
responsible for the oversight of the filing of candidates in
any nonpartisan election in any [political subdivision or]
special district shall clearly designate where candidates
shall form a line to effectuate such filings and determine

SB 1329 3
the order of such filings; except that, in the case of
candidates who file a declaration of candidacy with the
election authority or political subdivision prior to 5:00
p.m. on the first day for filing, the election authority or
political subdivision may determine by random drawing the
order in which such candidates' names shall appear on the
ballot. If a drawing is conducted pursuant to this
subsection, it shall be conducted so that each candidate, or
candidate's representative if the candidate filed under
subsection 2 of section 115.355, may draw a number at random
at the time of filing. If such drawing is conducted, the
election authority or political subdivision shall record the
number drawn with the candidate's declaration of candidacy.
If such drawing is conducted, the names of candidates filing
on the first day of filing for each office on each ballot
shall be listed in ascending order of the numbers so drawn.
3. The governing body of any city, town, or village
with two thousand or fewer inhabitants may submit to the
voters at any available election, a question to adopt the
provisions of subsection 1 of this section for [municipal]
special district elections. If a majority of the votes cast
by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the
question, then the city, town, or village shall conduct
[nonpartisan municipal] elections as provided in subsection
1 of this section for all nonpartisan elections remaining in
the year in which the proposal was adopted and for the six
calendar years immediately following such approval. At the
end of such six-year period, each such [city, town, or
village] special district shall be prohibited from
conducting such elections in such a manner unless such a
question is again adopted by the majority of qualified
voters as provided in this subsection.

SB 1329 4
115.137. 1. Except as provided in subsection 2 of
this section, any citizen who is entitled to register and
vote shall be entitled to register for and vote pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter in all statewide public
elections and all public elections held for districts and
political subdivisions within which he resides.
2. Any person who and only persons who fulfill the
ownership requirements shall be entitled to vote in
elections for which ownership of real property is required
by law for voting.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, no person shall be entitled to vote in a primary
election of an established political party unless he or she
is affiliated with such party, as evidenced by his or her
voter registration.
115.168. 1. (1) If a registered voter chooses to
change his or her political party affiliation, the voter may
notify the election authority of such change. Any change of
political party affiliation shall be made by signed, written
notice in substantially the same manner as a change of
address application is filed under section 115.165.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2027, if a registered voter
changes his or her political party affiliation within twenty-
three weeks of a primary election of an established
political party, the voter's change of affiliation shall not
be applied by the election authority to his or her voter
registration until after such election. A registered voter
may only vote in the primary election of the established
political party with which he or she was affiliated on the
twenty-third Tuesday before such election.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2027, notwithstanding any
provision of this section to the contrary, any person who

SB 1329 5
was not previously registered to vote in this state who
submits a voter registration application by 5:00 p.m. on the
fourth Wednesday prior to the primary election of an
established political party may choose a political party
affiliation or unaffiliation and may vote in such election.
(4) Any person who was registered to vote in this
state as of January 1, 2027, who has not declared a
political party affiliation on his or her voter registration
shall be considered by the election authority to be
unaffiliated with an established political party unless such
person chooses to vote in the primary election of an
established political party held on the first Tuesday after
the first Monday in August, 2028, in which case section
115.398 shall apply.
2. For purposes of this section, the phrase "change
his or her political party affiliation" shall mean changing
affiliation from one established political party to another
established political party, changing from affiliation with
an established political party to unaffiliated, or changing
from unaffiliated to affiliation with an established
political party.
115.225. 1. Before use by election authorities in
this state, the secretary of state shall approve the marking
devices and the automatic tabulating equipment used in
electronic voting systems and may promulgate rules and
regulations to implement the intent of sections 115.225 to
115.235.
2. No electronic voting system shall be approved
unless it:
(1) Permits voting in absolute secrecy;
(2) Permits each voter to vote for as many candidates
for each office as a voter is lawfully entitled to vote for;

SB 1329 6
(3) Permits each voter to vote for or against as many
questions as a voter is lawfully entitled to vote on, and no
more;
(4) Provides facilities for each voter to cast as many
write-in votes for each office as a voter is lawfully
entitled to cast;
(5) Permits each voter in a primary election to vote
for the candidates of only one party [announced by the voter
in advance];
(6) Permits each voter at a presidential election to
vote by use of a single mark for the candidates of one party
or group of petitioners for president, vice president and
their presidential electors;
(7) Accurately counts all proper votes cast for each
candidate and for and against each question;
(8) Is set to reject all votes, except write-in votes,
for any office and on any question when the number of votes
exceeds the number a voter is lawfully entitled to cast;
(9) Permits each voter, while voting, to clearly see
the ballot label;
(10) Has been tested and is certified by an
independent authority that meets the voting system standards
developed by the Federal Election Commission or its
successor agency. The provisions of this subdivision shall
not be required for any system purchased prior to August 28,
2002.
3. The secretary of state shall promulgate rules and
regulations to allow the use of a computerized voting
system. The procedures shall provide for the use of a
computerized voting system with the ability to provide a
paper audit trail. Notwithstanding any provisions of this

SB 1329 7
chapter to the contrary, such a system may allow for the
storage of processed ballot materials in an electronic form.
4. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and
any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2002, shall be
invalid and void.
5. If any election authority uses any touchscreen
direct-recording electronic vote-counting machine, the
election authority may continue to use such machine. Upon
the removal of such voting machine from the election
authority's inventory because of mechanical malfunction,
wear and tear, or any other reason, the machine shall not be
replaced and no additional direct-recording electronic vote-
counting machine shall be added to the election authority's
inventory. Such machines shall not be used beginning
January 1, 2024. Equipment that is designed for
accessibility shall provide a paper ballot audit trail.
6. (1) Each election authority that controls its own
information technology department shall, once every two
years, allow a cyber security review of their office by the
secretary of state or alternatively by an entity that
specializes in cyber security reviews. Each political
subdivision that controls the information technology
department for an election authority shall, once every two

SB 1329 8
years, allow a cyber security review of the information
technology department by the secretary of state or
alternatively by an entity that specializes in cyber
security reviews. The secretary of state shall, once every
two years, allow a cyber security review of its office by an
entity that specializes in cyber security reviews. For
purposes of this section, an entity specializes in cyber
security review if it employs one or more individuals who:
(a) Have at least five years management experience in
information security or five years' experience as an
information security analyst;
(b) Have worked in at least two of the domains listed
in paragraph (c) of this subdivision that are covered in the
exam required by such paragraph; and
(c) Have attained an information security
certification by passing an exam that covers at least three
of the following topics:
a. Information technology risk management,
identification, mitigation, and compliance;
b. Information security incident management;
c. Information security program development and
management;
d. Risk and control monitoring and reporting;
e. Access control systems and methodology;
f. Business continuity planning and disaster recovery
100 planning;
101 g. Physical security of election authority property;
102 h. Networking security; or
103 i. Security architecture application and systems
104 development.
105 (2) If an election authority or political subdivision
106 fails to have a cyber security review as required by this

SB 1329 9
107 subsection, the secretary of state may publish a notice of
108 noncompliance in a newspaper within the jurisdiction of the
109 election authority or in electronic format. The secretary
110 of state is also authorized to withhold funds from an
111 election authority in violation of this section unless such
112 funding is a federal mandate or part of a federal and state
113 agreement.
114 7. The secretary of state shall have authority to
115 require cyber security testing, including penetration
116 testing, of vendor machines, programs, and systems. Failure
117 to participate in such testing shall result in a revocation
118 of vendor certification. Upon notice from another
119 jurisdiction of cyber security failures or certification
120 withholds or revocation, the secretary of state shall have
121 authority to revoke or withhold certification for vendors.
122 The requirements of this section shall be subject to
123 appropriation for the purpose of cyber security testing.
124 8. The secretary of state may designate an
125 organization of which each election authority shall be a
126 member, provided there is no membership fee and the
127 organization provides information to increase cyber security
128 and election integrity efforts.
129 9. All audits required by subsection 6 of this section
130 that are conducted by the secretary of state shall be solely
131 paid for by state and federal funding.
115.249. No voting machine shall be used unless it:
(1) Permits voting in absolute secrecy;
(2) Permits each voter to vote for as many candidates
for each office as he is lawfully entitled to vote for, and
no other;
(3) Permits each voter to vote for or against as many
questions as he is lawfully entitled to vote on, and no more;

SB 1329 10
(4) Provides facilities for each voter to cast as many
write-in votes for each office as he is lawfully entitled to
cast;
(5) Permits each voter in a primary election to vote
for the candidates of only one party [announced by the voter
in advance];
(6) Correctly registers or records and accurately
counts all votes cast for each candidate and for and against
each question;
(7) Is provided with a lock or locks which prevent any
movement of the voting or registering mechanism and any
tampering with the mechanism;
(8) Is provided with a protective counter or other
device whereby any operation of the machine before or after
an election will be detected;
(9) Is provided with a counter which shows at all
times during the election how many people have voted on the
machine;
(10) Is provided with a proper light which enables
each voter, while voting, to clearly see the ballot labels.
115.279. 1. Application for an absentee ballot may be
made by the applicant in person, or by mail, or for the
applicant, in person, by his or her guardian or a relative
within the second degree by consanguinity or affinity. The
election authority shall accept applications by facsimile
transmission and by electronic mail within the limits of its
telecommunications capacity.
2. Notwithstanding section 115.284, no individual,
group, or party shall solicit a voter into obtaining an
absentee ballot application. Absentee ballot applications
shall not have the information prefilled prior to it being
provided to a voter. Nothing in this section shall be

SB 1329 11
interpreted to prohibit a state or local election authority
from assisting an individual voter.
3. Each application shall be made to the election
authority of the jurisdiction in which the person is or
would be registered. Each application shall be in writing
and shall state the applicant's name, address at which he or
she is or would be registered, his or her reason for voting
an absentee ballot, the address to which the ballot is to be
mailed, if mailing is requested, and for absent uniformed
services and overseas applicants, the applicant's email
address if electronic transmission is requested. If the
reason for the applicant voting absentee is due to the
reasons established under subdivision (6) of subsection 3 of
section 115.277, the applicant shall state the voter's
identification information provided by the address
confidentiality program in lieu of the applicant's name,
address at which he or she is or would be registered, and
address to which the ballot is to be mailed, if mailing is
requested. [Each application to vote in a primary election
shall also state which ballot the applicant wishes to
receive. If any application fails to designate a ballot,
the election authority shall, within three working days
after receiving the application, notify the applicant by
mail that it will be unable to deliver an absentee ballot
until the applicant designates which political party ballot
he or she wishes to receive. If the applicant does not
respond to the request for political party designation, the
election authority is authorized to provide the voter with
that part of the ballot for which no political party
designation is required.]
4. All applications for absentee ballots received
prior to the sixth Tuesday before an election shall be

SB 1329 12
stored at the office of the election authority until such
time as the applications are processed in accordance with
section 115.281. No application for an absentee ballot
received in the office of the election authority by mail, by
facsimile transmission, by electronic mail, or by a guardian
or relative after 5:00 p.m. on the second Wednesday
immediately prior to the election shall be accepted by any
election authority. No application for an absentee ballot
submitted by the applicant in person after 5:00 p.m. on the
day before the election shall be accepted by any election
authority, except as provided in subsections 7, 8, and 9 of
this section.
5. Each application for an absentee ballot shall be
signed by the applicant or, if the application is made by a
guardian or relative pursuant to this section, the
application shall be signed by the guardian or relative, who
shall note on the application his or her relationship to the
applicant. If an applicant, guardian or relative is blind,
unable to read or write the English language or physically
incapable of signing the application, he or she shall sign
by mark, witnessed by the signature of an election official
or person of his or her own choosing. Any person who
knowingly makes, delivers or mails a fraudulent absentee
ballot application shall be guilty of a class one election
offense.
6. (1) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any
resident of the state of Missouri who resides outside the
boundaries of the United States or who is on active duty
with the Armed Forces of the United States or members of
their immediate family living with them may request an
absentee ballot for both the primary and subsequent general
election with one application.

SB 1329 13
(2) The election authority shall provide each absent
uniformed services voter and each overseas voter who submits
a voter registration application or an absentee ballot
request, if the election authority rejects the application
or request, with the reasons for the rejection.
(3) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, if
a standard oath regarding material misstatements of fact is
adopted for uniformed and overseas voters pursuant to the
Help America Vote Act of 2002, the election authority shall
accept such oath for voter registration, absentee ballot, or
other election-related materials.
(4) Not later than sixty days after the date of each
regularly scheduled general election for federal office,
each election authority which administered the election
shall submit to the secretary of state in a format
prescribed by the secretary a report on the combined number
of absentee ballots transmitted to, and returned by, absent
uniformed services voters and overseas voters for the
election. The secretary shall submit to the Election
Assistance Commission a combined report of such information
not later than ninety days after the date of each regularly
scheduled general election for federal office and in a
standardized format developed by the commission pursuant to
100 the Help America Vote Act of 2002. The secretary shall make
101 the report available to the general public.
102 (5) As used in this section, the terms "absent
103 uniformed services voter" and "overseas voter" shall have
104 the meaning prescribed in 52 U.S.C. Section 20310.
105 7. An application for an absentee ballot by a new
106 resident shall be submitted in person by the applicant in
107 the office of the election authority in the election
108 jurisdiction in which such applicant resides. The

SB 1329 14
109 application shall be received by the election authority no
110 later than 7:00 p.m. on the day of the election. Such
111 application shall be in the form of an affidavit, executed
112 in duplicate in the presence of the election authority or
113 any authorized officer of the election authority, and in
114 substantially the following form:
115 "STATE OF _________
116 COUNTY OF _________ , ss.
117 I, ______, do solemnly swear that:
118 (1) Before becoming a resident of this state,
119 I resided at ______ (residence address) in
120 ______ (town, township, village or city)
121 of ______ County in the state of ______;
122 (2) I moved to this state after the last day
123 to register to vote in such general
124 presidential election and I am now
125 residing in the county of ______, state of
126 Missouri;
127 (3) I believe I am entitled pursuant to the
128 laws of this state to vote in the
129 presidential election to be held November
130 ______, ______ (year);
131 (4) I hereby make application for a
132 presidential and vice presidential ballot.
133 I have not voted and shall not vote
134 other than by this ballot at such
135 election.
136 Signed __________________
137 (Applicant)
138 __________________

SB 1329 15
139 (Residence Address)
140 Subscribed and sworn to before me this ______ day
141 of ______, ______
142 Signed __________________
143 (Title and name of officer authorized to administer
144 oaths)"
145 8. The election authority in whose office an
146 application is filed pursuant to subsection 7 of this
147 section shall immediately send a duplicate of such
148 application to the appropriate official of the state in
149 which the new resident applicant last resided and shall file
150 the original of such application in its office.
151 9. An application for an absentee ballot by an
152 interstate former resident shall be received in the office
153 of the election authority where the applicant was formerly
154 registered by 5:00 p.m. on the second Wednesday immediately
155 prior to the election, unless the application is made in
156 person by the applicant in the office of the election
157 authority, in which case such application shall be made no
158 later than 7:00 p.m. on the day of the election.
115.287. 1. Upon receipt of a signed application for
an absentee ballot and if satisfied the applicant is
entitled to vote by absentee ballot, the election authority
shall, within three working days after receiving the
application, or if absentee ballots are not available at the
time the application is received, within five working days
after they become available, deliver to the voter an
absentee ballot, ballot envelope and such instructions as
are necessary for the applicant to vote. For applications
for an absentee ballot to vote in a primary election, the

SB 1329 16
election authority shall only deliver to the voter the
ballot that corresponds to the established political party
with which the voter is affiliated, according to his or her
voter registration, or, if the voter is unaffiliated, the
unaffiliated ballot. Delivery shall be made to the voter
personally in the office of the election authority or by
bipartisan teams appointed by the election authority, or by
first class, registered, or certified mail at the discretion
of the election authority, or in the case of a covered voter
as defined in section 115.902, the method of transmission
prescribed in section 115.914. Where the election authority
is a county clerk, the members of bipartisan teams
representing the political party other than that of county
clerk shall be selected from a list of persons submitted to
the county clerk by the county chairman of that party. If
no list is provided by the time that absentee ballots are to
be made available, the county clerk may select a person or
persons from lists provided in accordance with section
115.087. If the election authority is not satisfied that
any applicant is entitled to vote by absentee ballot, it
shall not deliver an absentee ballot to the applicant.
Within three working days of receiving such an application,
the election authority shall notify the applicant and state
the reason he or she is not entitled to vote by absentee
ballot. The applicant may file a complaint with the
elections division of the secretary of state's office under
and pursuant to section 115.219.
2. If, after 5:00 p.m. on the second Wednesday before
an election, any voter from the jurisdiction has become
hospitalized, becomes confined due to illness or injury, or
is confined in an intermediate care facility, residential
care facility, or skilled nursing facility on election day,

SB 1329 17
as such terms are defined in section 198.006, in the county
in which the jurisdiction is located or in the jurisdiction
of an adjacent election authority within the same county,
the election authority shall appoint a team to deliver,
witness the signing of and return the voter's application
and deliver, witness the voting of and return the voter's
absentee ballot. If the election authority receives ten or
more applications for absentee ballots from the same address
it shall appoint a team to deliver and witness the voting
and return of absentee ballots by voters residing at that
address, except when such addresses are for an apartment
building or other structure wherein individual living units
are located, each of which has its own separate cooking
facilities. Each team appointed pursuant to this subsection
shall consist of two registered voters, one from each major
political party. Both members of any team appointed
pursuant to this subsection shall be present during the
delivery, signing or voting and return of any application or
absentee ballot signed or voted pursuant to this subsection.
3. On the mailing and ballot envelopes for each
covered voter, the election authority shall stamp
prominently in black the words "FEDERAL BALLOT, STATE OF
MISSOURI" and "U.S. Postage Paid, 39 U.S.C. Section 3406".
4. No information which encourages a vote for or
against a candidate or issue shall be provided to any voter
with an absentee ballot.
115.327. 1. When submitted for filing, each petition
for the nomination of an independent candidate or for the
formation of a new political party shall be accompanied by a
declaration of candidacy for each candidate to be nominated
by the petition or by the party, respectively. The party's
duly authorized chairman and treasurer shall also submit a

SB 1329 18
certified complete list of the names and addresses of all
their candidates and the office for which each seeks. The
party shall nominate its candidates in the manner prescribed
in the party's bylaws. If presidential electors are to be
nominated, at least one qualified resident of each
congressional district shall be named as a nominee for
presidential elector. The number of candidates to be
nominated shall equal the number of electors to which the
state is entitled. Each declaration of candidacy for the
office of presidential elector shall be in the form provided
in section 115.399. Each declaration of candidacy for an
office other than presidential elector shall state the
candidate's full name, residence address, office for which
he proposes to be a candidate, the party, if any, upon whose
ticket he is to be a candidate and that if nominated and
elected he will qualify. Each such declaration shall be in
substantially the following form:
I, ______, a resident and registered voter of the
______ precinct of the town of ______ or the ______
precinct of the ______ ward of the city of ______,
or the ______ precinct of ______ township of the
county of ______ and the state of Missouri, do
announce myself a candidate for the office of
______ on the ______ ticket, to be voted for at the
general (special) election to be held on the ______
day of ______, 20______, and I further declare that
if nominated and elected I will qualify.
__________________ Subscribed and
sworn
Signature of to before me this
candidate
______ day of

SB 1329 19
______, 20______
__________________ __________________
Residence address Signature of
election
official or
officer
authorized to
administer oaths
Each such declaration shall be subscribed and sworn to by
the candidate before the election official accepting the
candidate's petition, a notary public or other officer
authorized by law to administer oaths.
2. Any person who files a declaration of candidacy as
an independent candidate or as the candidate of a new
political party for election to an office shall be
unaffiliated with any established political party, as
evidenced by his or her voter registration, no later than
the twenty-third Tuesday prior to the last Tuesday in
February immediately preceding the primary election.
115.349. 1. Except as otherwise provided in sections
115.361 to 115.383, no candidate's name shall be printed on
any official primary ballot unless the candidate has filed a
written declaration of candidacy in the office of the
appropriate election official by 5:00 p.m. on the last
Tuesday in March immediately preceding the primary election.
2. No declaration of candidacy for nomination in a
primary election shall be accepted for filing prior to 8:00

SB 1329 20
a.m. on the last Tuesday in February immediately preceding
the primary election.
3. Each declaration of candidacy for nomination in a
primary election shall state the candidate's full name,
residence address, office for which such candidate proposes
to be a candidate, the party ticket on which he or she
wishes to be a candidate and that if nominated and elected
he or she will qualify. The declaration shall be in
substantially the following form:
I, ______, a resident and registered voter of the
county of ______ and the state of Missouri, residing
at ______, do announce myself a candidate for the
office of ______ on the ______ party ticket, to be
voted for at the primary election to be held on the
______ day of ______, ______, and I further declare
that if nominated and elected to such office I will
qualify.
______________________ Subscribed and sworn to
Signature of candidate before me this ______
day of ______, ______
______________________ ______________________
Residence address Signature of election
official or other
officer authorized to
administer oaths
______________________
Mailing address (if
different)
______________________
Telephone Number
(Optional)

SB 1329 21
If the declaration is to be filed in person, it shall be
subscribed and sworn to by the candidate before an official
authorized to accept his or her declaration of candidacy.
If the declaration is to be filed by certified mail pursuant
to the provisions of subsection 2 of section 115.355, it
shall be subscribed and sworn to by the candidate before a
notary public or other officer authorized by law to
administer oaths.
4. Any person who files a declaration of candidacy as
a party candidate for nomination or election to an office
shall be affiliated with that political party, as evidenced
by his or her voter registration, no later than the twenty-
third Tuesday prior to the last Tuesday in February
immediately preceding the primary election.
115.351. [No person who files as a party candidate for
nomination or election to an office shall, without
withdrawing, file as another party's candidate or an
independent candidate for nomination or election to the
office for the same term. No person who files as an
independent candidate for election to an office shall,
without withdrawing, file as a party candidate for
nomination or election to the office for the same term.] No
person shall file for one office and, without withdrawing,
file for another office to be filled at the same election.
Receipt by the secretary of state of proper certification of
nomination pursuant to subsection 1 of section 115.399
constitutes withdrawal by operation of law pursuant to
subsection 1 of section 115.359 of any presidential or vice
presidential nominee from any other office for which such
nominee is a candidate at the same election. Any person
violating any provision of this section shall be

SB 1329 22
disqualified from running for nomination or election to any
office at the primary and general election next succeeding
the violation.
115.363. 1. Except as provided in section 115.361, a
party nominating committee of a political party may select a
party candidate for nomination to an office on the primary
election ballot in the following cases:
(1) If there are no candidates for nomination as the
party candidate due to death of all the party's candidates
after 5:00 p.m. on the last day in which a person may file
as a candidate for nomination and at or before 5:00 p.m. on
the tenth Tuesday prior to the primary election;
(2) If there are no candidates for nomination as the
party candidate due to withdrawal after 5:00 p.m. on the
last day in which a person may file as a candidate for
nomination and at or before 5:00 p.m. on whatever day may be
fixed by law as the final date for withdrawing as a
candidate for the office;
(3) If there are no candidates for nomination as the
party candidate due to death or disqualification of all
candidates within seven days prior to the filing deadline
and if no person has filed for the party nomination within
that time;
(4) If there are no candidates for nomination as the
party candidate due to disqualification of all party
candidates after 5:00 p.m. on the last day on which a person
may file as a candidate for nomination, and at or before
5:00 p.m. on the tenth Tuesday prior to the primary
election; or
(5) If a candidate for the position of political party
committeeman or committeewoman dies or withdraws as provided

SB 1329 23
in subsection 1 or 2 of section 115.359 after the tenth
Tuesday prior to the primary election, leaving no candidate.
2. Any established political party may select a
candidate for nomination, if a candidate who is the
incumbent or only candidate dies, is disqualified or
withdraws pursuant to subsection 1 or 2 of section 115.359
after 5:00 p.m. on the tenth Tuesday prior to the primary
election, and at or before 5:00 p.m. on whatever day is
fixed by law as the final date for withdrawing as a
candidate for the office.
3. A party nominating committee may select a party
candidate for election to an office on the general election
ballot in the following cases:
(1) If the person nominated as the party candidate
shall die at or before 5:00 p.m. on the tenth Tuesday prior
to the general election;
(2) If the person nominated as the party candidate is
disqualified at or before 5:00 p.m. on the tenth Tuesday
prior to the general election;
(3) If the person nominated as the party candidate
shall withdraw at or before 5:00 p.m. on whatever day may be
fixed by law as the final date for withdrawing as a
candidate for the office;
(4) If a candidate for nomination to an office in
which the person is the party's only candidate dies after
5:00 p.m. on the tenth Tuesday prior to any primary
election, withdraws as provided in subsection 1 of section
115.359 after 5:00 p.m. on the tenth Tuesday prior to any
primary election, or is disqualified after 5:00 p.m. on the
tenth Tuesday before any primary election.
4. If a person nominated as a party's candidate who is
unopposed shall die at or before 5:00 p.m. on the tenth

SB 1329 24
Tuesday prior to the general election, is disqualified at or
before 5:00 p.m. on the tenth Tuesday prior to the general
election, or shall withdraw at or before 5:00 p.m. on
whatever day may be fixed by law as the final date for
withdrawing as a candidate for the office, the party
nominating committee for any established political party may
select a party candidate.
5. A party nominating committee may select a party
candidate for election to an office in the following cases:
(1) For an election called to fill a vacancy in an
office;
(2) For an election held pursuant to the provisions of
section 105.030 to fill an unexpired term resulting from a
vacancy in an office that occurs within fourteen days prior
to the filing deadline for the primary election and not
later than the tenth Tuesday prior to the general election.
If such vacancy occurs prior to the fourteenth day before
the filing deadline for a primary election, filing for the
office shall be as provided for in sections 115.307 to
115.359.
6. Any party candidate selected by a party nominating
committee pursuant to this section shall be affiliated with
the political party of the committee, as evidenced by his or
her voter registration.
115.395. 1. At each primary election, there shall be
as many separate ballots as there are established political
parties entitled to participate in the election.
Additionally, there shall be a separate ballot for
unaffiliated voters which shall contain only ballot measures
and nonpartisan candidates submitted by political
subdivisions and special districts.

SB 1329 25
2. The names of the candidates for each office on each
party ballot shall be listed in the order in which they are
filed, except that, in the case of candidates who file a
declaration of candidacy with the secretary of state prior
to 5:00 p.m. on the first day for filing, the secretary of
state shall determine by random drawing the order in which
such candidates' names shall appear on the ballot. The
drawing shall be conducted so that each candidate, or
candidate's representative if the candidate filed under
subsection 2 of section 115.355, may draw a number at random
at the time of filing. The secretary of state shall record
the number drawn with the candidate's declaration of
candidacy. The names of candidates filing on the first day
for filing for each office on each party ballot shall be
listed in ascending order of the numbers so drawn. For the
purposes of this subsection, the election authority
responsible for oversight of the filing of candidates, other
than candidates that file with the secretary of state, shall
clearly designate where candidates, or a candidate's
representative if the candidate filed under subsection 2 of
section 115.355, shall form a line to effectuate such
filings and determine the order of such filings; except
that, in the case of candidates who file a declaration of
candidacy with the election authority prior to 5:00 p.m. on
the first day for filing, the election authority may
determine by random drawing the order in which such
candidates' names shall appear on the ballot. If a drawing
is conducted pursuant to this subsection, it shall be
conducted so that each candidate, or candidate's
representative if the candidate filed under subsection 2 of
section 115.355, may draw a number at random at the time of
filing. If such drawing is conducted, the election

SB 1329 26
authority shall record the number drawn with the candidate's
declaration of candidacy. If such drawing is conducted, the
names of candidates filing on the first day for filing for
each office on each party ballot shall be listed in
ascending order of the numbers so drawn.
3. Insofar as applicable, the provisions of sections
115.237 and 115.245 shall apply to each ballot prepared for
a primary election, except that the ballot information may
be placed in vertical or horizontal rows, no circle shall
appear under any party name and no write-in lines shall
appear under the name of any office for which a candidate is
to be nominated at the primary. At a primary election,
write-in votes shall be counted only for persons who can be
elected to an office at the primary.
115.397. 1. In each primary election, each voter
shall be entitled to receive the ballot of [one and only
one] the established political party[, designated by the
voter before receiving his ballot] with which such voter is
affiliated, as evidenced by his or her voter registration.
Any voter who has chosen to be unaffiliated shall only be
permitted to cast an unaffiliated ballot.
2. Each voter who participates in a party primary
shall be entitled to vote on all questions and for any
nonpartisan candidates submitted by political subdivisions
and special districts at the primary election. Each voter
who does not wish to participate in a party primary may vote
on all questions and for any nonpartisan candidates
submitted by a political subdivision or special district at
the primary election.
115.398. 1. For any person who was registered to vote
in this state as of January 1, 2027, if such person
thereafter casts a ballot on the primary election day held

SB 1329 27
on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in August 2028,
such person may pick any ballot and the election authority
shall note the ballot designated and cast by such person and
make a notation on the person's voter registration as
follows:
(1) If the person participates in a party primary by
designating the ballot of an established political party,
then the election authority shall make a notation on the
person's voter registration to reflect that he or she is
affiliated with such party;
(2) If the person participates in the nonpartisan
primary by designating the unaffiliated ballot with only
questions and nonpartisan candidates, then the election
authority shall make a notation on the person's voter
registration to reflect that he or she is unaffiliated.
2. For any person who casts a ballot on the primary
election day held on the first Tuesday after the first
Monday in August 2028, the notation made by the election
authority pursuant to subsection 1 of this section at the
last primary election at which the person casts a ballot
shall dictate such person's political party affiliation or
unaffiliation for all primary elections held after September
1, 2028.
115.409. Except election authority personnel, election
judges, watchers and challengers appointed pursuant to
section 115.105 or 115.107, law enforcement officials at the
request of election officials or in the line of duty, minor
children under the age of eighteen accompanying an adult who
is in the process of voting, international observers who
have registered as such with the election authority, persons
designated by the election authority to administer a
simulated youth election for persons ineligible to vote

SB 1329 28
because of their age, members of the news media who present
identification satisfactory to the election judges and who
are present only for the purpose of bona fide news coverage
except as provided in subdivision (18) of section 115.637,
provided that such coverage does not disclose how any voter
cast the voter's ballot on any question or candidate [or in
the case of a primary election on which party ballot they
voted] or does not interfere with the general conduct of the
election as determined by the election judges or election
authority, and registered voters who are eligible to vote at
the polling place, no person shall be admitted to a polling
place.
115.429. 1. The election judges shall not permit any
person to vote unless satisfied that such person is the
person whose name appears on the precinct register.
2. The identity or qualifications of any person
offering to vote may be challenged by any election authority
personnel, any registered voter, or any duly authorized
challenger at the polling place. No person whose right to
vote is challenged shall receive a ballot until his or her
identity and qualifications have been established.
3. Any question of doubt concerning the identity or
qualifications of a voter shall be decided by a majority of
the judges from the major political parties. If such
election judges decide not to permit a person to vote
because of doubt as to his or her identity or
qualifications, the person may apply to the election
authority as provided in section 115.193 or file a complaint
with the elections division of the secretary of state's
office under and pursuant to section 115.219.

SB 1329 29
4. If the election judges cannot reach a decision on
the identity or qualifications of any person, the question
shall be decided by the election authority.
5. The election judges or the election authority may
require any person whose right to vote is challenged to
execute an affidavit affirming his or her qualifications.
The election authority shall furnish to the election judges
a sufficient number of blank affidavits of qualification,
and the election judges shall enter any appropriate
information or comments under the title "Remarks" which
shall appear at the bottom of the affidavit. All executed
affidavits of qualification shall be returned to the
election authority with the other election supplies. Any
person who makes a false affidavit of qualification shall be
guilty of a class one election offense.
6. In the case of any primary election, the election
judges shall determine whether the voter's political party
affiliation is the same as the political party holding the
primary election.
115.710. 1. Each declaration of candidacy for any
city, town, or village office, or any township office in a
township organization county shall state the candidate's
full name, residence address, office for which such
candidate proposes to be a candidate, the party ticket on
which he or she wishes to be a candidate, and that if
elected he or she will qualify. The declaration shall be in
substantially the following form:
I, ______, a resident and registered voter of the
county of ______ and the state of Missouri, residing
at ______, do announce myself a candidate for the
office of ______ on the ______ party ticket, to be
voted for at the general municipal election to be held

SB 1329 30
on the ______ day of ______, ______, and I further
declare that if elected to such office I will qualify.
__________________ Subscribed and sworn
Signature of candidate to before me this
______ day of
______, ______
__________________ __________________
Residence address Signature of election
official or other
officer authorized to
administer oaths
__________________
Mailing address (if
different)
__________________
Telephone Number (Optional)
2. If the declaration is to be filed in person, it
shall be subscribed and sworn to by the candidate before an
official authorized to accept his or her declaration of
candidacy. If the declaration is to be filed by certified
mail or any other means, it shall be subscribed and sworn to
by the candidate before a notary public or other officer
authorized by law to administer oaths.
✓